Georgia statutes. TITLE 8 Buildings and Housing
Article 4 Fair Housing

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 1988, p. 698, effective July 1, 1988, repealed the Code sections formerly codified as this article and enacted the current article. The former article, which dealt with discrimination in sale, lease, or financing of housing, consisted of §§

8-3-200

through

8-3-208

and was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 1593.

Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, effective July 1, 1990, repealed the Code sections formerly codified as this article and enacted the current article. The former article, which dealt with fair housing, consisted of Code Sections 8-3-200 through 8-3-215 and was based on Ga. L. 1988, p. 698.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Georgia fair housing law, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Commission on Equal Opportunity, Chapter 186-2.

Law reviews.

For comment, “‘A Fresh Look’: Title VII’s New Promise for LGBT Discrimination Protection Post-Hively,” see
68 Emory L.J. 1101 (2019).

8-3-200.
State policy; purposes and construction of article.

It is the policy of the State of Georgia to provide, within constitutional limitations, for fair housing throughout this state.

The general purposes of this article are:

To provide for execution in the state of policies embodied in Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968, as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988;

To safeguard all individuals from discrimination in any aspect relating to the sale, rental, or financing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilities in connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of that individual’s race, color, religion, sex, disability or handicap, familial status, or national origin;

To promote the elimination of discrimination in any aspect relating to the sale, rental, or financing of dwellings or in the provision of brokerage services or facilities in connection with the sale or rental of a dwelling because of a person’s race, color, religion, sex, disability or handicap, familial status, or national origin; and

To promote the protection of each individual’s interest in personal dignity and freedom from humiliation and the individual’s freedom to take up residence wherever such individual chooses; to secure the state against domestic strife and unrest which would menace its democratic institutions; to preserve the public safety, health, and general welfare; and to further the interests, rights, and privileges of individuals within this state.

This article shall be broadly construed to further the general purposes stated in this Code section and the special purposes of the particular provision involved.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-200

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 1; Ga. L. 2020, p. 493, § 8/SB 429.

The 2020 amendment,

effective July 29, 2020, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “throughout this state” for “throughout the state” at the end of subsection (a); and substituted “within this state” for “within the state” at the end of paragraph (b)(4).

8-3-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article, the term:

“Administrator” means the administrator of the Commission on Equal Opportunity created under Article 2 of Chapter 19 of Title 45.

“Aggrieved person” means any person who claims to have been injured by a discriminatory housing practice or who believes that he or she will be irrevocably injured by a discriminatory housing practice that is about to occur.

(2.1)

“Board of commissioners” means the Board of Commissioners of the Commission on Equal Opportunity created by Code Section 45-19-23 or a panel of three members of said board.

“Complainant” means the person, including the administrator, who files a complaint under Code Section 8-3-208.

“Conciliation” means the attempted resolution of issues raised by a complaint, or by the investigation of such complaint, through informal negotiations involving the aggrieved person, the respondent, and the administrator.

“Conciliation agreement” means a written agreement setting forth the resolution of the issues in conciliation.

“Covered multifamily dwelling” means a building which consists of four or more units and has an elevator or the ground floor units of a building which consists of four or more units and does not have an elevator.

“Disability” means, with respect to a person:

A physical or mental impairment which substantially limits one or more of such person’s major life activities;

A record of having such an impairment; or

Being regarded as having such an impairment, but such term does not include current, illegal use of or addiction to a controlled substance.

“Discriminatory housing practice” means an act that is unlawful under Code Section 8-3-202, 8-3-203, 8-3-204, 8-3-205, or 8-3-222.

“Dwelling” means any building, structure, or portion thereof which is occupied as, or designed or intended for occupancy as, a residence by one or more families, and any vacant land which is offered for sale or lease for the construction or location thereon of any such building, structure, or portion thereof.

“Familial status” means, with respect to a person:

That the person is a parent of or has legal custody of one or more individuals who have not attained the age of 18 years and such individuals are being domiciled with such parent or legal custodian;

That the person is the designee of a parent or other person having legal custody, with the written permission of the parent or other person, and that one or more individuals who have not attained the age of 18 years are being domiciled with such person; or

That the person is pregnant or is in the process of securing legal custody of any individual who has not attained the age of 18 years.

“Family” includes a single individual.

“Person” means one or more individuals, corporations, partnerships, associations, labor organizations, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, or fiduciaries.

“Respondent” means:

The person or other entity or the state or local government or agency accused in a complaint of an unfair housing practice; and

Any other person or entity identified in the course of an investigation and notified as required with respect to respondents so identified under subsection (d) of Code Section 8-3-207.

“State” means the State of Georgia.

“To rent” means to lease, to sublease, to let, and otherwise to grant for a consideration the right to occupy premises not owned by the occupant.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-201

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, §§ 2, 3; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 2.

8-3-202.
Unlawful practices in selling or renting dwellings; exceptions.

Except as exempted by subsection (b) or (d) of this Code section or Code Section 8-3-205, it shall be unlawful:

To refuse to sell or rent after the making of a bona fide offer, or to refuse to negotiate for the sale or rental of, or otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin;

To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection therewith, because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin;

To make, print, or publish or cause to be made, printed, or published any notice, statement, or advertisement, with respect to the sale or rental of a dwelling, that indicates any preference, limitation, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin, or an intention to make any such preference, limitation, or discrimination;

To represent to any person because of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin that any dwelling is not available for inspection, sale, or rental when such dwelling is in fact so available;

For profit, to induce or attempt to induce any person to sell or rent any dwelling by representations regarding the entry or prospective entry into the neighborhood of a person or persons of a particular race, color, religion, sex, familial status, or national origin or with a disability;

To discriminate in the sale or rental, or to otherwise make unavailable or deny, a dwelling to any buyer or renter because of a disability of:

That buyer or renter;

A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or

Any person associated with that buyer or renter;

To discriminate against any person in the terms, conditions, or privileges of sale or rental of a dwelling, or in the provision of services or facilities in connection with such dwelling, because of a disability of:

That person;

A person residing in or intending to reside in that dwelling after it is sold, rented, or made available; or

Any person associated with that person.

For purposes of this paragraph, discrimination includes:

A refusal to permit, at the expense of the person with disabilities, reasonable modifications of existing premises occupied or to be occupied by such person if such modifications may be necessary to afford such person full enjoyment of the premises, except that, in the case of a rental, the landlord may where it is reasonable to do so condition permission for a modification on the renter’s agreeing to restore the interior of the premises to the condition that existed before the modification, reasonable wear and tear excepted;

A refusal to make reasonable accommodations in rules, policies, practices, or services when such accommodations may be necessary to afford such person equal opportunity to use and enjoy a dwelling; or

In connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct those dwellings in such a manner that:

The public use and common use portions of such dwellings are readily accessible to and usable by persons with disabilities;

All the doors designed to allow passage into and within all premises within such dwellings are sufficiently wide to allow passage by persons with disabilities in wheelchairs; and

All premises within such dwellings contain the following features of adaptive design: (a) an accessible route into and through the dwelling; (b) light switches, electrical outlets, thermostats, and other environmental controls in accessible locations; (c) reinforcements in bathroom walls to allow later installation of grab bars; and (d) usable kitchens and bathrooms such that an individual in a wheelchair can maneuver about the space.

Compliance with the appropriate requirements of the American National Standard for buildings and facilities providing accessibility and usableness for physically disabled people (commonly cited as “ANSI A117.1”) suffices to satisfy the requirements of subdivision (B)(iii)(III) of this paragraph.

In regard to persons with disabilities, discrimination includes, in connection with the design and construction of covered multifamily dwellings for first occupancy after March 13, 1991, a failure to design and construct dwellings in such a manner that the dwellings have at least one building entrance on an accessible route, unless it is impracticable to do so because of the terrain or unusual characteristics of the site; or

To require, as a condition of tenancy in public housing, any prohibition or restriction of any lawful possession of a firearm within an individual dwelling unless required by federal law or regulation.

Nothing in this Code section, other than paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section, shall apply to:

Any single-family dwelling sold or rented by an owner, if:

Such private individual owner does not own more than three such single-family dwellings at any one time;

Such bona fide private individual owner does not own any interest in, nor is there owned or reserved on his or her behalf, under any express or voluntary agreement, title to or any right to all or a portion of the proceeds from the sale or rental of more than three such single-family dwellings at any one time;

Such dwelling is sold or rented:

Without the use in any manner of the sales or rental facilities or the sales or rental services of any real estate broker, agent, or salesman, or of such facilities or services of any person in the business of selling or renting dwellings, or of any employee or agent of any such broker, agent, salesman, or person; and

Without the publication, posting, or mailing, after notice, of any advertisement or written notice in violation of paragraph (3) of subsection (a) of this Code section; but nothing in this paragraph shall prohibit the use of attorneys, escrow agents, abstractors, title companies, and other such professional assistance as necessary to perfect or transfer the title; or

Rooms or units in dwellings containing living quarters occupied or intended to be occupied by no more than four families living independently of each other, if the owner actually maintains and occupies one of such living quarters as his or her residence.

In the case of the sale of any such single-family dwelling by a private individual owner not residing in such dwelling at the time of such sale or who was not the most recent resident of such dwelling prior to such sale, the exemption granted by this subsection shall apply only with respect to one such sale within any 24 month period.

For the purposes of subsection (b) of this Code section, a person shall be deemed to be in the business of selling or renting dwellings if:

He has, within the preceding 12 months, participated as principal in three or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein;

He has, within the preceding 12 months, participated as agent, other than in the sale of his own personal residence, in providing sales or rental facilities or sales or rental services in two or more transactions involving the sale or rental of any dwelling or any interest therein; or

He is the owner of any dwelling designed or intended for occupancy by, or occupied by, five or more families.

Nothing contained in this Code section shall require that a dwelling be made available for rental or lease to an individual whose tenancy would constitute a direct threat to the health or safety of other individuals or whose tenancy would result in substantial physical damage to the property of others.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-202

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 4; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, §§ 13, 14, 16; Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1-2/HB 60; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 1/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or her” in division (b)(1)(A)(ii); substituted “paragraph (3) of subsection (a)” for “subsection (c)” in subdivision (b)(1)(A)(iii)(II); and inserted “or her” near the end of subparagraph (b)(1)(B).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “renter’s” was substituted for “renter” in division (a)(7)(B)(i) and a comma was substituted for a semicolon following “owner” in the introductory language of subparagraph (b)(1)(A).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2014, p. 599, § 1/HB 60, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that:
“This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Safe Carry Protection Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 47 (2014).

8-3-203.
Unlawful denial of or discrimination in membership or participation in service or organization relating to selling or renting dwellings.

It shall be unlawful to deny any person access to or membership or participation in any multiple-listing service, real estate brokers’ organization, or other service, organization, or facility relating to the business of selling or renting dwellings or to discriminate against such person in the terms or conditions of such access, membership, or participation on account of race, color, religion, sex, disability, familial status, or national origin.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-203

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13.

8-3-204.
Discrimination in residential real estate related transactions; appraisals.

As used in this Code section, the term “residential real estate related transaction” means any of the following:

The making or purchasing of loans or providing other financial assistance:

For purchasing, constructing, improving, repairing, or maintaining a dwelling; or

Secured by residential real estate; or

The selling, brokering, or appraising of residential real property.

It shall be unlawful for any person or other entity whose business includes engaging in residential real estate related transactions to discriminate against any person in making available such a transaction or in the terms or conditions of such a transaction because of race, color, religion, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin.

Nothing in this article shall be construed to prohibit a person engaged in the business of furnishing appraisals of real property from taking into consideration factors other than race, color, religion, national origin, sex, handicap, or familial status.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-204

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-205.
Permissible limitations in sale, rental, or occupancy of dwellings by religious organizations or private clubs; housing for older persons.

Nothing in this article shall prohibit a religious organization, association, or society, or any nonprofit institution or organization operated, supervised, or controlled by or in conjunction with a religious organization, association, or society, from limiting the sale, rental, or occupancy of dwellings which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose to persons of the same religion or from giving preference to such persons unless membership in such religion is restricted on account of race, color, sex, handicap, familial status, or national origin. Nothing in this article shall prohibit a private club not in fact open to the public, which as an incident to its primary purpose or purposes provides lodgings which it owns or operates for other than a commercial purpose, from limiting the rental or occupancy of such lodgings to its members or from giving preference to its members.

As used in this subsection, the term “housing for older persons” means housing:

Provided under any state or federal program that the secretary of housing and urban development determines is specifically designed and operated to assist elderly persons as defined in the state or federal program;

Intended for, and solely occupied by, persons 62 years of age or older; or

Intended and operated for occupancy by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit. In determining whether housing qualifies as housing for older persons under this subsection, the administrator shall develop regulations which require at least the following factors:

The existence of significant facilities and services specifically designed to meet the physical or social needs of older persons, or, if the provision of such facilities and services is not practicable, that such housing is necessary to provide important housing opportunities for older persons;

That at least 80 percent of the units are occupied by at least one person 55 years of age or older per unit; and

The publication of and adherence to policies and procedures which demonstrate an intent by the owner or manager to provide housing for persons 55 years of age or older.

Nothing in this article limits the applicability of any reasonable local, state, or federal restrictions regarding the maximum number of occupants permitted to occupy a dwelling. The provisions in this article regarding familial status shall not apply with respect to housing for older persons.

Housing shall not fail to meet the requirements for housing for older persons by reason of:

Persons residing in such housing as of March 12, 1989, who do not meet the age requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection; provided, however, that new occupants of such housing meet the age requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection; or

Unoccupied units; provided, however, that such units are reserved for occupancy by persons who meet the age requirements of subparagraph (B) or (C) of paragraph (1) of this subsection.

Nothing in this article prohibits conduct against a person because such person has been convicted by any court of competent jurisdiction of the illegal manufacture or distribution of a controlled substance.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 5; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 2/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “secretary of housing and urban development” for “administrator” in subparagraph (b)(1)(A).

8-3-206.
Powers and duties of administrator; housing and urban development programs of other agencies.

The authority and responsibility for administering this article shall be vested in the administrator of the Commission on Equal Opportunity.

The administrator may delegate any of the administrator’s functions, duties, and powers to employees of the Commission on Equal Opportunity or to boards of such employees, including functions, duties, and powers with respect to investigating, conciliating, hearing, determining, ordering, certifying, reporting, or otherwise acting as to any work, business, or matter under this article. Insofar as possible, conciliation meetings shall be held in the cities or other localities where the discriminatory housing practices allegedly occurred.

All departments and agencies of state government shall administer their programs and activities relating to housing and urban development in a manner affirmatively to further the purposes of this article and shall cooperate with the administrator to further such purposes.

The administrator shall:

Make studies with respect to the nature and extent of discriminatory housing practices in representative communities, urban, suburban, and rural, throughout the state;

Publish in print or electronically and disseminate reports, recommendations, and information derived from such studies;

Cooperate with and render technical assistance to local and other public or private agencies, organizations, and institutions which are formulating or carrying on programs to prevent or eliminate discriminatory housing practices;

Administer the programs and activities relating to housing in a manner affirmatively to further the policies of this article;

Adopt, promulgate, amend, and rescind, subject to the approval of the Governor after giving proper notice and hearing to all interested parties pursuant to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the “Georgia Administrative Procedure Act,” such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this article;

Cooperate with the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development created by Section 10(b) of the Department of Housing and Urban Development Act of 1965 (79 Stat. 667) and with other federal and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of Title VIII of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (82 Stat. 81), as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (102 Stat. 1619), and to cooperate with other federal and local agencies in order to achieve the purposes of this article;

Accept gifts, bequests, grants, or other public or private payments on behalf of the state and pay such moneys into the state treasury;

Accept on behalf of the state reimbursement pursuant to Section 810 of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (82 Stat. 85), as amended by the Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988 (102 Stat. 1625), for services rendered to assist the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development; and

Maintain with the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development status as a “certified agency” under Section 810 of the Civil Rights Act of 1968 (82 Stat. 85), as amended by the Fair Housing Act of 1988 (102 Stat. 1625), and as provided by the rules and regulations of said department.

To avoid any duplicate investigation, civil action, or administrative enforcement by the administrator, in any case where the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development has initiated an investigation or any action or proceedings against any person relative to any acts or omissions by such person which may be in violation of this article, the administrator shall have no authority to initiate or pursue against such person any investigation, civil action, or administrative enforcement covered by the provisions of this article with regard to the same acts or omissions or facts or circumstances to which the federal investigation or proceedings are applicable. Nothing in this subsection is intended to prevent the dual filing of complaints of discriminatory housing practices with the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development and the administrator.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-206

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1992, p. 1840, § 6; Ga. L. 2010, p. 838, § 10/SB 388; Ga. L. 2020, p. 603, § 3/HB 969.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (e), in the first sentence, substituted “To avoid any duplicate investigation, civil action, or administrative enforcement by the administrator, in” for “In” at the beginning and substituted “United States” for “federal”, and added the last sentence.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1990, “provisions” was substituted for “provision” in paragraph (d)(5).

8-3-207.
Educational and conciliatory activities; conferences; consultation as to extent of discrimination; reports.

The administrator shall commence such educational and conciliatory activities as in the administrator’s judgment will further the purposes of this article.
The administrator shall call conferences of persons in the housing industry and other interested parties to acquaint them with this article and the administrator’s suggested means of implementing this article and shall endeavor with their advice to work out programs of voluntary compliance and of enforcement.
The administrator shall consult with state and local officials and other interested parties to learn the extent, if any, to which housing discrimination exists in this state, and whether and how enforcement programs might be utilized to combat such discrimination in connection with the administrator’s enforcement of this article.
The administrator shall issue reports on such conferences and consultations as the administrator deems appropriate.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-207

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-208.
Discriminatory housing practice complaint procedures.

An aggrieved person may, not later than one year after an alleged discriminatory housing practice has occurred or terminated, file a complaint with the administrator alleging such discriminatory housing practice. The administrator, on the administrator’s own initiative, may also file such a complaint. Complaints shall be in writing and under oath and shall contain such information and be in such form as the administrator requires. Upon the filing of a complaint under this subsection, the administrator shall serve notice upon the aggrieved person acknowledging the filing and advising the aggrieved person of procedural time limits and the choice of forums provided under this article.

The administrator shall, not later than ten days after the filing of a complaint or the identification of an additional respondent under subsection (d) of this Code section, serve on the respondent a notice identifying the alleged discriminatory housing practice and advising such respondent of the procedural rights and obligations under this article, together with a copy of the original complaint. Each respondent may file, not later than ten days after receipt of notice from the administrator, an answer to the complaint.

Complaints and answers shall be verified and may be reasonably and fairly amended at any time.

A person who is not named as a respondent in a complaint, but who is identified as a respondent in the course of an investigation, may be joined as an additional or substitute respondent upon written notice to such person from the administrator as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section. In addition to meeting the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section, the notice shall explain the basis for the administrator’s belief that such person is properly joined as a respondent.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-208

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-209.
Investigations; conciliation agreements; final report; breach of conciliation agreement; disclosure; action for temporary relief; transmittal of information.

The administrator shall investigate an alleged discriminatory housing practice and complete such investigation within 100 days after the filing of a complaint unless it is impracticable to do so. If the administrator is unable to complete the investigation within 100 days after the filing of a complaint, the administrator shall notify the complainant and respondent of the reasons for the failure to complete the investigation.

During the period beginning with the filing of such complaint and ending with the filing of a charge or a dismissal by the administrator, the administrator shall, to the extent feasible, engage in conciliation with respect to such complaint. A conciliation agreement arising out of such conciliation shall be an agreement between the respondent and the complainant and shall be subject to approval by the administrator. A conciliation agreement may provide for binding arbitration of the dispute arising from the complaint. Any such arbitration that results from a conciliation agreement may award appropriate relief, including monetary relief. Each conciliation agreement shall be made public unless the complainant and respondent otherwise agree and the administrator determines that disclosure is not required to further the purposes of this article.

At the end of each investigation under this Code section, the administrator shall prepare a final investigative report containing the following:

The names and dates of contacts with witnesses;

A summary and the dates of correspondence and other contacts with the aggrieved person and the respondent;

A summary description of other pertinent records;

A summary of witness statements; and

Answers to interrogatories.

A final report under this subsection may be amended if additional evidence is later discovered.

Whenever the administrator has reasonable cause to believe that a respondent has breached a conciliation agreement, the administrator shall refer the matter to the Attorney General with a recommendation that a civil action be filed for the enforcement of such agreement.

Nothing said or done in the course of conciliation under this article may be made public or used as evidence in a subsequent proceeding under this article without the written consent of the parties concerned.

Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of this subsection, the administrator shall make available to the aggrieved person and the respondent at any time upon request following completion of the administrator’s investigation information derived from an investigation and any final investigative report relating to that investigation.

If the administrator concludes at any time following the filing of a complaint that prompt judicial action is necessary to carry out the provisions of this article, the administrator may authorize a civil action for appropriate temporary or preliminary relief pending final disposition of the complaint under this Code section. Upon such authorization, the Attorney General may commence and maintain such an action. Any temporary restraining order or other order granting preliminary or temporary relief shall be issued in accordance with Chapter 11 of Title 9, the “Georgia Civil Practice Act.” The commencement of a civil action under this subsection does not affect the initiation or continuation of administrative proceedings under this Code section and Code Sections 8-3-213 and 8-3-214.

Whenever the administrator has reason to believe that a basis may exist for the commencement of proceedings against any respondent under subsection (a) of Code Section 8-3-218 or for proceedings by any governmental licensing or supervisory authorities, the administrator shall transmit the information upon which such belief is based to the Attorney General, or to such authorities, as the case may be.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-209

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 94, § 8.

8-3-210.
Procedure where local fair housing law applicable.

Wherever a local fair housing law provides rights and remedies for alleged discriminatory housing practices which are substantially equivalent, as certified by the Secretary of Housing and Urban Development as provided in Section 810 of the federal Fair Housing Amendments Act of 1988, to the rights and remedies provided under this article, the administrator shall notify the appropriate local agency of any complaint filed which appears to constitute a violation of the local fair housing law, and the administrator shall take no further action with respect to such complaint if the local law enforcement official has, within 30 days from the date the alleged offense was brought to his attention, commenced proceedings in the matter.
In no event shall the administrator take further action unless the administrator certifies that, in the administrator’s judgment under the circumstances of the particular case, the protection of the rights of the parties or the interests of justice require such action.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-210

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-211.
Procedure on filing of discriminatory housing practice complaint.

The administrator shall, within 100 days after the filing of the complaint, determine based on the facts whether reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, unless it is impracticable to do so or unless the administrator has approved a conciliation agreement with respect to the complaint. If the administrator is unable to make the determination within 100 days after the filing of the complaint, the administrator shall notify the complainant and respondent in writing of the reasons for not doing so.

If the administrator determines that reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the administrator shall, except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection, immediately issue a charge on behalf of the aggrieved person.

The charge shall consist of a short and plain statement of the facts upon which the administrator has found reasonable cause to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, shall be based on the final investigative report, and need not be limited to the facts or grounds alleged in the complaint.

If, after investigation, the administrator determines that the matter involves the legality of any state or local zoning or other land use law or ordinance, the administrator shall immediately refer the matter to the Attorney General for appropriate action instead of issuing such charge.

If the administrator determines that no reasonable cause exists to believe that a discriminatory housing practice has occurred or is about to occur, the administrator shall promptly dismiss the complaint. The administrator shall make public disclosure of each such dismissal. The administrator may not issue a charge under this Code section regarding an alleged discriminatory housing practice after the beginning of the trial of a civil action commenced by the aggrieved party under an act of Congress or a state law, seeking relief with respect to that discriminatory housing practice. After the administrator issues a charge under this Code section, the administrator shall cause a copy thereof to be served on each respondent named in such charge, together with a notice of opportunity for a hearing at a time and place specified in the notice, and on each aggrieved person on whose behalf the complaint was filed.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-211

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.

8-3-212.
Subpoenas and discovery; penalties for violations.

The administrator may issue subpoenas and order discovery in aid of investigations and hearings under this article. Such subpoenas and discovery may be ordered to the same extent and subject to the same limitations as would apply if the subpoenas or discovery were ordered or served in aid of a civil action in superior court in which the investigation is taking place.

Witnesses summoned by a subpoena under this Code section shall be entitled to the same witness and mileage fees as witnesses in proceedings in superior courts. Fees payable to a witness summoned by a subpoena issued at the request of a party shall be paid by the party.

Any person who willfully fails or neglects to attend and testify or to answer any lawful inquiry or to produce records, documents, or other evidence, if it is in such person’s power to do so, in obedience to the subpoena or other lawful order under subsection (a) of this Code section, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction thereof, shall be punished by a fine of not more than $1,000.00.

Any person who, with intent thereby to mislead another person in any proceeding under this article:

Makes or causes to be made any false entry or statement of fact in any report, account, record, or other document produced pursuant to subpoena or other lawful order under subsection (a) of this Code section;

Willfully neglects or fails to make or to cause to be made full, true, and correct entries in such reports, accounts, records, or other documents; or

Willfully mutilates, alters, or by any other means falsifies any documentary evidence

shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be fined not more than $1,000.00.

History.

Code 1981, §

8-3-212

, enacted by Ga. L. 1990, p. 1284, § 1.